Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201413-2105
State government
interagency response team.

The Governor shall provide a state government interagency
response team to work with local governments and enterprise zone associations
on effective ways to use new and existing resources from all levels of government
to improve development capacity in enterprise zones and accomplish the purposes
of the Enterprise Zone Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 725, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB800, § 2.